Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.300

Adoption statistical data.

The department of health shall be a depository for statistical data concerning adoption. It shall furnish to the clerk of each county a data card which shall be completed and filed with the clerk on behalf of each petitioner. The clerk shall forward the completed cards to the department of health which shall compile the data and publish reports summarizing the data. A birth certificate shall not be issued showing the petitioner as the parent of any child adopted in the state of Washington until a data card has been completed and filed.

[ 1991 c 3 s 288; 1990 c 146 s 5; 1984 c 155 s 30.]